Utah statutes.
78B-13-103.   Proceedings governed by other law.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "adoption proceeding" means any proceeding under Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 1, Utah Adoption Act.

(2)  This chapter does not govern:

(a)  an adoption proceeding; or

(b)  a proceeding pertaining to the authorization of emergency medical care for a child.

